Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.280

Restrictive provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW not applicable to promotional printing and literature of commissions.

The restrictive provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW shall not apply to promotional printing and literature for any commission formed under this chapter.

[ 2015 c 225 s 11; 1972 ex.s. c 112 s 5.]

NOTES: